Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0195

Discriminatory government contracts prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state and its political subdivisions, and all officials, agents, employees, or representatives thereof, are prohibited from entering into any agreement or contract with any individual, group, association, or corporation which in any way, directly or indirectly, discriminates against licensed chiropractors in performing and receiving compensation for services covered by their licenses.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 4. Formerly RCW 18.25.150.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 18.25.0192.